Mississippi, session 2026, HB1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purposes of this section, a "health insurer" means any health insurance company, nonprofit hospital and medical service corporation, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, managed care organization, pharmacy benefit manager, and, to the extent permitted under federal law, any administrator of an insured, self-insured or publicly funded health care benefit plan offered by public and private entities, the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan and any other public health care assistance program offered or administered by the state or any political subdivision or instrumentality of the state, and other parties that are by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service. (2)  A health insurer may not deny the claim of a covered person solely because the covered person has not received a vaccine that has ever been recommended or required or is currently recommended or required by the State Health Officer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.